New York, session 2025-2026, S6394.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "New York state sustainable data centers act".
§ 2. Legislative intent and findings. The legislature finds that data
centers are significant energy and water consumers and significant
contributors to air and water pollution. The expansion and operation of
data centers across the state impairs New York state's ability to
achieve the renewable energy and emissions reduction benchmarks required
by the climate leadership and community protection act due to their
significant use of energy and water and significant emissions of green-
house gases generated through the power needs of their operation. Given
the growing demand for the construction of data centers, there is a
critical need to improve the energy efficiency of data centers and
reduce their energy consumption, water consumption, reliance on fossil
fuels, and emissions. Likewise, the large quantities of water used by
data centers contribute an additional threat to the health of the
state's waters, the ecosystems of which they are an integral part, and
the residents of the state who rely on them. This act will ensure that
economic development involving data centers is consistent with the
state's environmental standards and principles, and that where renewable
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD09616-05-5

S. 6394--A 2
energy is used to power data centers, that such energy is being used
responsibly, with the interests and health of the public in mind.
§ 3. The public service law is amended by adding a new article 12 to
read as follows:
ARTICLE 12
REGULATION OF DATA CENTER ENERGY CONSUMPTION
Section 240. Definitions.
241. Data center disclosure reports.
242. Public engagement.
243. Annual data center disclosure report updates.
§ 240. Definitions. For the purposes of this article:
1. "Carbon dioxide equivalents" shall have the meaning given to such
term in section 75-0101 of this chapter.
2. "Data center" shall mean: (a) a structure, group of structures, or
infrastructure within an existing structure for the central housing of
server racks that are used for the interconnection and operation of
information technology and network telecommunications equipment for the
provision of data storage, data processing, or data transport services;
and (b) all related facilities and infrastructure for power distrib-
ution, environmental control, cooling and security required to deliver
the desired service with respect to the specific data center.
3. "Data center operator" shall mean the owner or operator of the data
center, or other person who has comparable rights of use over a data
center, including any person or entity responsible for allocating space
for external use of information technology and network telecommuni-
cations equipment within a data center.
4. "Data center disclosure report" shall mean that report which data
center operators must submit to the commission prior to construction of
a data center, as required by section two hundred forty-one of this
article.
5. "Employee" shall have the meaning given to such term in section
seven hundred forty of the labor law.
6. "Host community" shall mean any municipality within which a data
center, or any portion thereof, has been developed or proposed for
development, or which suffers any negative impact from a data center.
7. "Negative impact" shall mean any increase in emissions of regulated
air contaminants as defined in subdivision twenty-two of section 19-0107
of the environmental conservation law, discharges into waters of the
state as described in subdivision two of section 17-0301 of the environ-
mental conservation law, noise pollution, or any other form of pollution
that affects a host community.
8. "Renewable energy" shall have the same meaning as "renewable energy
systems" as defined in section sixty-six-p of this chapter.
9. "Regulated data center" shall mean a data center projected to have
an energy usage capacity of five or more megawatts.
10. "Bill credit" means a monthly monetary credit which is funded by a
data center operator as further determined by the commission and appears
on the utility bill of a low income or moderate income customer located
in this state.
11. "Hyperscale data center" shall mean a data center that takes up
ten thousand square feet or more and uses at least five thousand serv-
ers.
12. "Micro data center" shall mean a data center that is enclosed
within one standard server rack and does not support critical loads of
more than one hundred fifty kilowatts.

S. 6394--A 3
§ 241. Data center disclosure reports. For any proposed regulated data
center, the proposed data center operator shall submit a data center
disclosure report to the department and the commission at least one
hundred eighty days prior to commencing any construction activities
related to a regulated data center. The report shall contain relevant
information regarding the proposed regulated data center, including:
1. (a) the host community or communities in which the regulated data
center will be located; and
(b) the organization of the planned regulated data center as a single
operator enterprise or managed data center, colocated facility, hypers-
cale data center, micro data center, or a container or modular data
center.
2. the number of full-time and part-time employees the data center
operator intends to employ at the planned regulated data center and
relevant demographic information including but not limited to:
(a) the education levels of the employees intended to be employed at
the planned data center, with percentages included for highest education
achieved including high school diploma, associate's degree, bachelor's
degree, and higher level of education; and
(b) the projected percentage of employees residing in the host commu-
nity or communities.
3. (a) the projected average energy usage of the planned data center
per day and related information including but not limited to:
(i) the projected type of energy being used that is neither fossil
fuel nor renewable energy, where applicable;
(ii) the forms of renewable energy expected to be utilized; and
(iii) the projected percentage of energy usage that is fossil fuel,
renewable energy, and neither renewable energy nor fossil fuel where the
data center is operating at peak;
(b) the projected average amount of energy usage per hour of the
planned data center during peak load measured in kilowatt-hours and
anticipated frequency of peak load per week;
(c) the projected annual emissions of carbon dioxide equivalents
produced to power the facility which are produced off-site;
(d) the projected annual amount of waste heat produced on-site, meas-
ured in British thermal units;
(e) the projected percentage of the annual amount of recovered waste
heat, that was transformed into energy to power the data center; and
(f) the intended use for recovered waste heat to include but not be
limited to general building heating, cooling systems, coolant system
specifically for the capture of waste heat from processors.
4. If a planned regulated data center is required to obtain and hold a
permit pursuant to title fifteen of article fifteen of the environmental
conservation law, the data center operator shall report:
(a) the amount of water projected to be used annually and how that
water will be used in the planned regulated data center; and
(b) the average amount of water expected to be used daily measured in
gallons.
5. For any regulated data center making any discharge within the mean-
ing of article seventeen of the environmental conservation law, the data
center operator shall report:
(a) the annual projected discharges by type and amount; and
(b) how discharges will be treated, if at all, to remove pollutants
and/or to what extent discharge temperature will be adjusted, if at all,
before being discharged.

S. 6394--A 4
6. The commission may promulgate rules requiring additional disclo-
sures, as appropriate.
§ 242. Public engagement. The commission shall publicize the data
disclosure report on its website within ten days of receiving such
report. The data center operator shall hold at least two public hearings
within sixty days after submitting its data center disclosure report to
the commission. At least one of the two public hearings must be held
within the host community where the data center operator plans to locate
its data center. The data center operator shall provide at least thirty
days advance notice to residents of host communities of any planned
public hearings. Notice of public hearings shall include the time,
place, and location of each public hearing, a summary of the proposed
data center project, and the specific location of the planned data
center. Methods of providing notice to a host community shall include,
but shall not be limited to, coverage in any print or digital publica-
tion produced by local, community, and ethnic media. During a public
hearing conducted pursuant to this section, the data center operator
must explicitly disclose and present its finding under section two
hundred forty-three of this article in clear and concise language
comprehensible for members of the public in general. It shall also
address the efforts it will make to reduce any negative impacts to the
host community and its environment that the planned data center may
cause. A draft of the data center disclosure report shall be made
publicly available no later than thirty days prior to the first hearing.
§ 243. Annual data center disclosure report updates. 1. A regulated
data center operator shall submit an annual data disclosure report to
the commission, which the commission shall post on its website within
fifteen days of receipt. Data center operators shall include all changes
to the disclosures required pursuant to section two hundred forty-one of
this article from year-to-year. Additionally, annual reports shall
include but not be limited to information regarding the data center
operator's efforts toward greater energy efficiency and overall sustain-
ability that year. Such findings shall be presented in clear and
concise language readily comprehensible for members of the general
public.
2. Specifically, data center operators shall report:
(a) Efforts made to reduce energy consumption within the past year;
(b) A comparison of the year's energy consumption to the initial
projected amounts outlined in subdivision three of section two hundred
forty-one of this article, and, following the first year, a comparison
to the year before;
(c) A projection for energy usage for the next year, that includes the
same information as required by subdivision three of section two hundred
forty-one of this article;
(d) Efforts made to reduce fossil fuel consumption and increase the
percentage of energy use of, or support for renewable energy within the
past year, with a comparison of the year's fossil fuel consumption to
the projected amount, and, following the first year, a comparison to the
year before;
(e) Efforts made to reduce water consumption within the past year;
(f) (i) For data centers that are required to obtain and hold a permit
pursuant to title fifteen of article fifteen of the environmental
conservation law, a comparison of the year's water usage to the project-
ed amount, and, following the first year, a comparison to the year
before, expressed in gallons; and

S. 6394--A 5
(ii) For data centers that are required to have a permit pursuant to
title fifteen of article fifteen of the environmental conservation law,
a projection for water usage for the next year, disclosing the same
information as required by subdivision four of section two hundred
forty-one of this article;
(g) Efforts made to protect the environment and public from polluted
water in the past year accompanied by measurements of actual water
pollution in a manner to be determined by the department pursuant to
regulations;
(h) Efforts made to reduce waste heat and utilize waste heat to power
the data center accompanied by measurements of actual heat waste emis-
sion and reuse; and
(i) Percentage of data center employees that live within the host
community.
3. In the event of any noncompliance with section two hundred forty-
one or two hundred forty-three of this article, the department shall
notify the data center operator. The data center operator shall have
sixty days to cure such violation. If such violation has not been cured
after sixty days, such data center shall be subject to fines of up to
ten thousand dollars based on the severity and extent of the violation
and shall be assessed another ten thousand dollar fine for every day
they are late in complying with such sections. All funds collected under
this article shall be deposited into the environmental protection fund
established by section ninety-two-s of the state finance law.
4. The department and the attorney general are authorized to enforce
the provisions of this article.
§ 4. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section
1854-e to read as follows:
§ 1854-e. Energy consumption efficiency goals. 1. No later than one
year after the effective date of this section, the authority, in
conjunction with the federally designed bulk system operator, the public
service commission, and the New York state climate action council shall
determine reasonable energy consumption efficiency goals for the design
and operation of data centers as defined in article twelve of the public
service law, including, but not limited to, recycling of waste heat
emitted from data centers into an energy source. Such goals shall align
with the benchmarks set forth in the climate leadership and community
protection act enacted by chapter one hundred six of the laws of two
thousand nineteen and shall be reviewed and updated accordingly, annual-
ly.
2. A data center operator that has commenced operation prior to the
effective date of this section shall have two years to comply with the
energy consumption efficiency goals developed pursuant to this section.
A data center operator that has commenced operation within one year of
the effective date of this section shall have one year to comply with
such energy consumption efficiency goals.
§ 5. The energy law is amended by adding a new article 19 to read as
follows:
ARTICLE 19
DATA CENTERS
Section 19-101. Fossil fuel power purchase agreements.
§ 19-101. Fossil fuel power purchase agreements. 1. Power purchase
agreements for any energy generated through the consumption of fossil
fuels shall not provide economic incentives or discounts to regulated
data centers, as set forth in article twelve of the public service law.

S. 6394--A 6
2. In furtherance of the goals set forth in the climate leadership and
community protection act: (a) by two thousand thirty, at least one-third
of all energy used by regulated data centers must be provided through
power purchase agreements exclusively for renewable energy; and (b) by
two thousand thirty-five, at least two-thirds of all energy used by
regulated data centers shall be provided through power purchase agree-
ments exclusively for renewable energy; and (c) by two thousand forty,
all energy used by regulated data centers shall be provided through
power purchase agreements exclusively for renewable energy.
3. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have
the following meanings:
(a) "Power purchase agreement" shall mean an agreement between a data
center operator, a utility, an authority, or an independent power
producer wherein the utility agrees to provide the data center electric-
ity, or an independent power producer, over a defined period of time.
(b) "Utility" shall have the same meaning as "utility company" as
defined in section two of the public service law.
§ 6. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 76-a to
read as follows:
§ 76-a. Data center surcharge and discount plan. 1. The public service
commission is hereby authorized and directed, to initiate a proceeding
within three months of this bill becoming law to establish a regulated
data center surcharge that will be charged to all regulated data
centers. The commission when determining the surcharge, shall ensure the
surcharge will be sufficient to cover any rate increases resulting from
transmission and distribution system upgrades that are required for
regulated data centers to interconnect to the grid and operate, along
with any increases in energy supply costs directly resulting from the
operations of data centers.
2. All monies collected from the regulated data center surcharge,
excluding any reasonable and prudently incurred utility administrative
costs associated from collecting the surcharge, shall be directed to the
energy affordability program created within the department case docket
14-M-0565, in the Order Adopting Low Income Program Modifications and
Directing Utility Filings, Proceeding on Motion of the Commission to
Examine Programs to Address Energy Affordability for Low Income Utility
Customers May 20, 2016, or any successor programs.
3. The commission shall authorize each electric utility corporation to
establish an account that is solely used for storing the proceeds of the
regulated utility data center surcharge, and once every year, upon
review and approval from the commission, shall transfer those proceeds
to their energy affordability program customers in the form of monthly
bill credits.
4. This proceeding shall include a public comment period of at least
sixty days and four public hearings in different regions of the state.
5. Within one year of the effective date of this section the commis-
sion shall issue an order requiring all electric corporations to imple-
ment a surcharge on regulated data centers within their service territo-
ries. The commission shall review and update this surcharge for
regulated data centers once every three years.
§ 7. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a
law.